Utah statutes.
32A-3-105.   Bond.
(1) (a)  Each package agent having a consignment liquor inventory owned by the
state shall have a consignment surety bond payable to the department in the
amount of the consignment inventory.
(b)  The bond shall be conditioned upon the agent's return of all unsold
liquor upon termination of the agency agreement.
(2) (a)  Each package agent owning his own liquor inventory shall post a cash
or corporate surety bond in the penal sum of $1,000 payable to the department,
which the package agent has procured and shall maintain for so long as the
package agent continues to operate.   The bond shall be in an amount fixed by
the department and in a form approved by the attorney general.
(b)  The bond shall be conditioned upon the faithful compliance of the package
agent with this title, the rules adopted by the commission under this title,
and the provisions of the package agency agreement.
